California statutes. Water Code
When the board has determined to issue bonds secured by benefit assessments, it shall, by resolution, employ a civil engineer, who shall have no interest, directly or indirectly, in any land in the district, to apportion the cost of the plan, to which shall be added the compensation to be paid the engineer, in accordance with benefit to each tract of land within the service area held in separate ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.8.

Upon completion of the apportionment of costs, the engineer shall prepare and certify to the board an assessment roll which shall contain all of the following:

(a) A description of the service area to be benefited by the plan and of any zones or subareas into which the service area has been divided.

(b) A description of each tract held in separate ownership by legal subdivision, governmental survey, or other boundary sufficient to identify it. If any area composed of more than one tract held in separate ownership is not assessed because the lands therein will not be benefited by the expenditure of the funds to be raised by the assessment, a description of the area as a whole without a description of each tract is sufficient.

(c) The number of acres in each tract.

(d) The name and address of the owner of each tract, if known, and if unknown, that fact. No mistake or error in the name of the owner of the property assessed and no mistake in any other particular shall render the assessment invalid. 

(e) The rate per acre of the assessment upon each tract assessed, or if no assessment is made upon any tract or area composed of more than one tract, a statement of that fact.

(f) The total amount of the assessment as computed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.9.

When completed, the roll, which shall be accompanied by the written report of the engineer setting out with particularity the exact nature and quantum of the benefits assessed, apportioned, and allocated to each tract of land in the service area with respect to each separable component of the proposed project, shall be certified by the engineer and filed with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.10.

The board shall file a copy of the roll and report in its records and forthwith give notice of the filing of the report and assessment roll by publication at least once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county, and by mailing copies of the notice to each affected landowner, as shown on the last equalized assessment book of the district or as is otherwise known to the district, stating therein the time and place of a special meeting which shall be not less than 15 days after the completion of publication and mailing at which meeting all interested persons, including all persons owning land in the district or in the affected drainage service area, may appear and be heard concerning any matter set forth in the roll and report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.11.

If no objections are presented to the board with respect to a particular assessment at the time and place noticed, the secretary shall execute a certificate in which the secretary shall certify that no objections were so presented and the assessment roll and certificate shall be filed in the district records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.12.

The board may continue the hearing on objections to assessments from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.13.

At the hearing, the board shall hear any evidence that may be offered on the correctness of the assessment and may modify, amend, or approve the assessment in any particular and may reapportion the whole or any part of it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.14.

After the hearing of objections, the board shall, by resolution, approve the assessment as finally fixed or modified. A certified copy of the assessment roll as finally fixed shall be filed in the district records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.15.

When the secretary files the certificate as provided in Section 35520.11 or, if objections are raised, when the board approves the assessment as finally fixed as provided in Section 35520.14, the board shall call a special district election at which there shall be submitted to the electors of the district the question of whether the board shall be authorized to issue bonds secured by the benefit assessment roll. The election shall be held and conducted in the manner set forth in Section 35520.16.
 To the right of or below each bond proposition on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 51.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.16.

The election required by Section 35520.15 shall be called, noticed, and held in the manner provided for bond elections by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35100) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35150) of Part 4, except as follows:

(a) The election shall be held on any Tuesday designated by the board which is not an election day designated in Section 1000 of the Elections Code and is not a state holiday or the day before or the day after a state holiday.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 35152.6, unless the voting procedure of the district has been changed from a landowner voting district to a resident voting district pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 35040) of Chapter 1 of Part 4, the qualified voters at the election shall be determined according to Article 1 (commencing with Section 35003) of Chapter 1 of Part 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 253.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.17.

The board may advance general funds of the district to pay all costs and expenses incurred in preparation of the plan of works and estimate of cost provided for by Section 35520.2, in the preparation of the assessment roll and report provided for by Sections 35520.7 and 35520.8, in noticing and calling the hearing required by Section 35520.10, and in calling, noticing, and holding the election provided by Section 35520.15. The advances shall be repaid to the general funds of the district with the proceeds of the call provided for in Section 35520.18 or from the proceeds of sale of the first division of bonds called for sale pursuant to Section 35520.24.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.18.

If more than one-third of the votes cast are for “Benefit Assessment Bonds - No,” the board shall, by resolution, abandon the project, make a call upon the assessment roll, certified as provided for by Section 35520.11 or as finally fixed as provided for by Section 35520.14, sufficient to pay all costs and expenses incurred in preparation of the plan of works and estimate of cost provided for by Section 35520.2, in the preparation of the assessment roll and report provided for by Sections 35520.7 and 35520.8, in noticing and holding the hearing required by Section 35520.10, and in calling, noticing, and holding the election provided for by Section 35520.15 and, thereafter, cancel all the assessment remaining uncalled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.19.

If two-thirds or more of the votes are cast in favor of the bonds, the board shall transmit a certified copy of the roll to the district tax collector. The charges assessed by the roll as certified as provided for by Section 35520.11, or as finally fixed as provided for by Section 35520.14, shall, upon recordation of a notice in each affected county in the manner specified in Section 3114 of the Streets and Highways Code, constitute a lien upon the land in each county which is prior to all other liens except city, county, and special district assessments or ad valorem taxes levied or assessed by or under statutory authority. The notice recorded pursuant to this section shall expressly provide that the lien is prior to all other liens except city, county,
 and special district assessments or ad valorem taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 52.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.20.

The assessment roll as approved by the board shall be conclusive evidence before any court or body that the assessment has been made and levied according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.21.

All unpaid assessments shall bear interest at the rate of 12 percent per annum. Interest shall commence to run 30 days after the board has adopted a resolution calling for the sale of bonds secured by the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.22.

The assessment list shall remain open for payment of any unpaid balance of the assessment thereon at the office of the district tax collector until such time as the board adopts a resolution calling for the sale of bonds secured by the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.23.

Payments on assessments made to the district tax collector prior to the adoption of a resolution of the board calling for the sale of bonds secured by the assessment shall be transferred by the tax collector to the district treasurer and placed in the construction fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.24.

Any time after the filing of the assessment roll as provided in Section 35520.19, the board may, by resolution, call for the sale of bonds secured by the assessment. The form and substance of the bonds and the sale thereof shall be governed by Sections 35520.35 and 35520.36. The total par value of bonds sold against any benefit assessment shall not exceed the total assessment less any collections against the assessment made prior to the first adoption of a resolution for sale of bonds secured by the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.25.

Collection of assessments levied and called by the board shall be made by the district tax collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.26.

Concurrently with the making of the annual estimate to be filed with the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 36552, the board shall designate and determine, by resolution, the percentage of any assessment previously levied that shall be called and collected. The interest due on unpaid assessments may be called without calling any installment of the assessment.

A certified copy of the call resolution shall be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county, commencing no more than 20 days following the adoption of the call resolution. The secretary, concurrently with the first publication of a certified copy of the call resolution, shall deliver certified copies thereof, one to the district assessor, one to the district tax collector, and one to the district treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.27.

The district assessor, upon receipt of the assessment call resolution from the secretary, shall compute the amount to be collected from each parcel of land in separate ownership in the service area established pursuant to Section 35520.6 and shall enter in a separate space in the district’s assessment book entitled “Drainage Service Area No. ____ Assessment” the sums, in dollars and cents, to be collected against the respective parcels of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.28.

Assessments called pursuant to this chapter shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as district assessments. When collected, the entire amount collected shall be transferred to the benefit assessment bond fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.29.

The board shall levy an amendatory assessment in the manner provided for original assessments if any of the following occur:

(a) Any land within the drainage service area is omitted from any assessment roll.

(b) Land appears on the assessment roll but is neither assessed or stated not to be assessed.

(c) A final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction has held that any assessment is not valid as to any part of the land assessed. This amendatory assessment shall be based upon a determination, as nearly as may be, of the amount the original assessment upon the land would have been except for the omission or invalidity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.30.

When any tract of land upon which any assessment has been levied is subdivided into smaller parcels, the board shall, upon its own motion or upon written application therefor signed by a landowner of record within the subdivided tract, after a hearing noticed and held in the same fashion as provided in Section 35520.10, reapportion the assessment upon the tract as will, in the judgment of the board, charge each of the smaller parcels with a just portion of the assessment. The reapportionment shall be entered in the minutes of the board and, upon entry, shall become final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.31.

The secretary shall file certified copies of any amendatory or reapportioned assessment with the district assessor, the district tax collector, and the district treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.32.

Upon the inclusion of any land within a drainage service area, an assessment shall be levied upon the land so included. The amount of the assessment against each tract or parcel is to be the amount, as nearly as can be determined, of all the assessments which would have been levied against the tract or parcel had it been included in the drainage service area from the time of the original levy of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.33.

When a district has levied an assessment and it appears to the board that the assessment or some part thereof, together with the interest thereon, will provide an amount greater than is required to meet all obligations incurred, or to be incurred for, the purposes for which the assessment or part thereof was levied, and if no bonds secured by the assessment are outstanding, the board may, by resolution, declare its intention to cancel all or any portion of the assessment, including any interest thereon, or all or any portion of the interest.

For the purposes of this section, the term “assessment balances” means the assessment and the interest thereon, and the board, in the manner and subject to the limitations provided in this chapter, may cancel any part of the assessment balance, including all of the assessment and the interest thereon, a part of the assessment and the interest thereon, all of the interest on the assessment, or a part of the interest on the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.34.

The board, pursuant to a resolution entered in its minutes, may distribute among the landowners of a drainage service area any funds in the treasury belonging to the service area which were collected on an assessment on which no bonds are outstanding or collected by way of interest or penalties on the assessment or by the rental, sale, or redemption of delinquent land under the assessment and which appear to the board to be greater than required to meet all obligations incurred or to be incurred for the purposes for which the assessment was levied. The distribution to the landowners shall be made in the proportion that they were assessed on the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.35.

All bonds issued under this chapter shall be payable in lawful money of the United States. Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the board shall prescribe the form and the manner of execution of the bonds.

An issue of bonds is hereby defined to be all of the bonds to be issued in accordance with a proposal approved by the electors of the district. Each issue of the bonds of a district shall be numbered consecutively, as authorized, and the bonds of each issue shall be numbered consecutively.

The board shall fix the date of the bonds, or may divide any issue into two or more divisions and fix different dates and different rates of interest for the bonds of the divisions. The date of any bond shall be subsequent to the election at which its issuance was authorized. The bonds shall be made payable at such times as the board prescribes, but in no case shall the maturity of any bond be more than 40 years from the date thereof. The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates to be fixed by the board, not exceeding 12 percent per annum, payable semiannually on the first day of January and the first day of July of each year. The principal and interest shall be payable at a place to be designated by the board and specified in each bond.

The bonds shall express on their face that they were issued under the authority of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.36.

The board may sell the bonds, from time to time, in such quantities as may be necessary and most advantageous to raise money to carry out the objects and purposes of this chapter.

Before making any sale, the board shall at a regular meeting, by resolution, declare its intention to sell a specified amount of the bonds and the day and hour and place of the sale and shall cause notice of the sale to be given by publication of the resolution at least once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county in which any portion of the district is located and, at its discretion, in other newspapers. The publications shall be complete not less than 10 days prior to the date of sale. The notice shall state that sealed proposals will be received for the purchase of the bonds until the day and hour named in the resolution.

The board shall award the purchase of the bonds to the highest responsible bidder. However, the board may reject all bids. The board shall, in no event, sell any of the bonds for less than 90 percent of the par value thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.37.

All bonds of the same issue shall be equally and ratably secured without priority by reason of number, date of bonds, date of sale, date of execution, or date of delivery by the lien of the benefit assessment roll recorded pursuant to Section 35520.19.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.38.

For the purpose of the care, operation, management, and improvement of a project or projects, including payment of salaries of officers and employees and all other expenses, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued under this chapter, the board may, in lieu, either in part or in whole, of calling assessments as provided for in this chapter, fix rates of tolls and charges for drainage facilities or available drainage facilities and other services rendered by the district and collect the tolls and charges from all persons receiving the benefit of the drainage facilities or other services. The tolls and charges shall be proportional as nearly as possible to the services rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.39.

Whenever any tolls or charges for the use of drainage facilities or for other services rendered by the district provided for in this chapter have been fixed by the board, they may be made payable in advance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.40.

In case any tolls or charges remain unpaid for a period of 30 days after they become payable, they shall become delinquent and a penalty of 10 percent shall be added thereto, and they bear interest at the rate of 1 percent per month or fraction thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.41.

After any toll or charge becomes delinquent, the board may, by resolution, direct the assessor to add to the assessment of the parcel of land to which it relates all delinquent tolls and charges, penalties, and interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.42.

In addition to and as an alternative to all other powers contained in this chapter with respect to provision of funds for the purpose of the care, operation, management, and improvement of a project or projects undertaken under the authority of this chapter, including the payment of salaries of officers and employees and all other expenses, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued under this chapter, zones may be established within the drainage service area for the purpose of fixing rates of assessment in accordance with the extent of benefits derived, or to be derived, by each zone from services to the land in each zone arising from the service area’s plan of works or any separately identifiable part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.43.

No zone shall be established or varying rates of assessment fixed under Section 35520.42, unless the board, by resolution, declares that it intends to do so and that a public hearing will be held thereon at a specified time and place where all interested persons may appear and be heard.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution in a newspaper of general circulation, published in each affected county, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the first publication to be at least 14 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. A copy of the resolution shall be mailed, postage prepaid, to each holder of title to land within the drainage service area as shown upon the last equalized assessment book of the distict at least 15 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. Any error, omission, or mistake in the mailing, or any failure of any person to receive a copy, shall not invalidate the proceedings pursuant to this section.

The hearing may be adjourned from time to time at the discretion of the board, and, at its conclusion, the board shall determine the zones of benefit established, if any, the share of benefits received by each zone arising from the district’s operation, expressed as a percentage, the criteria for establishing each zone, and the percentage expressed. A map of the drainage service area in such detail as to delineate the geographical area of each zone shall be a part of the resolution. The zones and the percentages may be amended from time to time or abolished in the same manner required for original adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.44.

The board annually, concurrently with the making of the estimate required by Section 36552, shall adopt a resolution setting forth an estimate of the amount of money needed for the purposes of the drainage service area for the next fiscal year. The amount shall be sufficient to raise interest accruing and principal maturing during the fiscal year on outstanding bonds of the district issued for the drainage service area, incidental expenses of the service area, and the cost of the care, operation, management, or improvement of the works of the drainage service area, or that part of the costs as the board determines is to be raised by assessment. The amount of the assessment to be borne by each zone shall be computed by multiplying the total amount to be raised by assessment by the percentage of benefits accruing to each zone as declared by the board.

In the resolution to be adopted pursuant to this section, the board shall provide for a public hearing upon the assessment to be levied and shall specify a time and place when all interested persons may appear and be heard. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution in a newspaper of general circulation, published in each affected county, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the first publication to be at least 14 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. A copy of the resolution shall be mailed, postage prepaid, to each holder of title to land within title within the drainage service area as shown upon the last equalized assessment book of the district. Any error, omission, or mistake in the mailing, or any failure of any person to receive a copy, shall not invalidate the proceedings pursuant to this section.

The hearing may be adjourned from time to time at the discretion of the board, and, at its conclusion, the board shall, by resolution, levy an assessment upon all lands within each zone sufficient to raise the amount stated in the estimate of the board as revised, if revised, at the hearing. Assessments made within each zone of benefit established pursuant to this chapter shall be levied on all lands within the zone of benefit on an acreage basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.45.

The secretary shall deliver certified copies of the resolution levying the assessment pursuant to Section 35520.44, one to the district assessor, one to the district tax collector, and one to the district treasurer.

The district assessor, upon receipt of a certified copy of the resolution, shall compute the amount to be collected from each parcel of land in separate ownership in the affected drainage service area and shall enter in a separate space in the district’s assessment book entitled “Drainage Service Area No. ____ Annual Assessment,” the sums, in dollars and cents, to be collected against the respective parcels of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.46.

Proceeds from assessments levied pursuant to this chapter may be used to pay any lawful obligation of the district incurred in the care, operation, or management of the works of the district for the drainage service area for which the assessment is levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.3. Provisions Pertaining Only to the Hot Spring Valley Water District [35521. - 35521.]

35521.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District in the County of Modoc is dissolved, and the Hot Spring Valley Water District is hereby formed in that county.

(b) The Hot Spring Valley Water District is declared to be, and shall be deemed, a water district as if the district had been formed pursuant to this division. The exterior boundary of the Hot Spring Valley Water District shall be the exterior boundary of the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District.

(c) The Hot Spring Valley Water District succeeds to, and is vested with, all of the powers, duties, responsibilities, obligations, liabilities, and jurisdiction
 of the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District.

(d) The status, position, and rights of any officer or employee of the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District shall not be affected by the transfer and shall be retained by the person as an officer or employee of the Hot Spring Valley Water District.

(e) The Hot Spring Valley Water District shall have ownership, possession, and control of all of the books, records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, licenses, permits, entitlements, agreements, contracts, claims, judgments, land, and other assets and property, real or personal, owned or leased by, connected with the administration of, or held for the benefit or use of the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District.

(f) The unexpended balance of any funds available for use by
 the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District shall be available for use by the Hot Spring Valley Water District.

(g) No payment for the use, or right of use, of any property, real or personal, acquired or constructed by the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District shall be required by reason of the succession pursuant to this act, nor shall any payment for the Hot Spring Valley Water District’s acquisition of the powers, duties, responsibilities, obligations, liabilities, and jurisdiction be required by reason of that succession.

(h) All ordinances, rules, and regulations adopted by the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District in effect immediately preceding January 1, 2009, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless readopted, amended, or repealed by the Hot Spring Valley Water District, or until they expire by their own terms. Any statute, law,
 rule, or regulation now in force, or that may hereafter be enacted or adopted with reference to the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District, shall mean the Hot Spring Valley Water District.

(i) Any action by or against the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District shall not abate, but shall continue in the name of the Hot Spring Valley Water District, and the Hot Spring Valley Water District shall be substituted for the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District by the court in which the action is pending. The substitution shall not in any way affect the rights of the parties to the action.

(j) No contract, lease, license, permit, entitlement, bond, or any other agreement to which the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District is a party shall be void or voidable by reason of this act, but shall continue in effect, with the Hot Spring Valley Water District assuming all
 of the rights, obligations, liabilities, and duties of the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District. Bonds issued by the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District shall become the indebtedness of the Hot Spring Valley Water District. Any continuing obligations or responsibilities of the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District for managing and maintaining bond issuances shall be transferred to the Hot Spring Valley Water District without impairment to any security contained in the bond instrument.

(k) (1) Notwithstanding Section 35003, each voter, as defined by Section 34027, of the Hot Spring Valley Water District shall be entitled to cast only one vote, regardless of the value, acreage, or number of parcels of the voter’s land within the district.

(2) Voting in the Hot Spring Valley Water District shall be by electoral divisions in accordance
 with Article 2 (commencing with Section 35025) of Chapter 1 of Part 4. The Hot Spring Valley Water District shall be divided into the same electoral divisions, with the same division boundaries, as those established within the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District. Members of the former Hot Spring Valley Irrigation District Board of Directors who are serving on January 1, 2009, may continue to serve the balance of their current terms of office, representing the same electoral divisions, as members of the Board of Directors of the Hot Spring Valley Water District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 182.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.4. Provisions Pertaining Only to the Vandalia Water District [35523. - 35523.]

35523.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Vandalia Irrigation District in the County of Tulare is dissolved, and the Vandalia Water District is hereby formed in that county.

(b) The Vandalia Water District is declared to be, and shall be deemed, a water district as if the district had been formed pursuant to this division. The exterior boundary of the Vandalia Water District shall be the exterior boundary of the former Vandalia Irrigation District.

(c) The Vandalia Water District succeeds to, and is vested with, all of the powers, duties, responsibilities, obligations, liabilities, and jurisdiction of the former Vandalia Irrigation District.

(d) The status, position, and rights of any officer or employee of the former Vandalia Irrigation District are not affected by the transfer and shall be retained by the person as an officer or employee of the Vandalia Water District.

(e) The Vandalia Water District shall have ownership, possession, and control of all of the books, records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, licenses, permits, entitlements, agreements, contracts, claims, judgments, land, and other assets and property, real or personal, owned or leased by, connected with the administration of, or held for the benefit or use of, the former Vandalia Irrigation District.

(f) The unexpended balance as of January 1, 2009, of any funds available for use by the former Vandalia Irrigation District shall be available for use by the Vandalia Water District.

(g) No payment for the use, or right of use, of any property, real or personal, acquired or constructed by the former Vandalia Irrigation District shall be required by reason of the succession pursuant to this act, nor shall any payment for the Vandalia Water District’s acquisition of the powers, duties, responsibilities, obligations, liabilities, and jurisdiction be required by reason of that succession.

(h) All ordinances, rules, and regulations adopted by the former Vandalia Irrigation District in effect immediately preceding January 1, 2009, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless amended or repealed by the Vandalia Water District, or until they expire by their own terms. Any statute, law, rule, or regulation in force as of December 31, 2008, or that may hereafter be enacted or adopted with reference to the former Vandalia Irrigation District shall mean the Vandalia Water District.

(i) Any action by or against the former Vandalia Irrigation District shall not abate, but shall continue in the name of the Vandalia Water District, and the Vandalia Water District shall be substituted for the former Vandalia Irrigation District by the court in which the action is pending. The substitution shall not in any way affect the rights of the parties to the action.

(j) No contract, lease, license, permit, entitlement, bond, or any other agreement to which the former Vandalia Irrigation District is a party shall be void or voidable by reason of the enactment of this chapter, but shall continue in effect, with the Vandalia Water District assuming all of the rights, obligations, liabilities, and duties of the former Vandalia Irrigation District. Bonds issued by the former Vandalia Irrigation District shall become the indebtedness of the Vandalia Water District. Any continuing obligations or responsibilities of the former Vandalia Irrigation District for managing and maintaining bond issuances shall be transferred to the Vandalia Water District without impairment to any security contained in the bond instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Provisions Pertaining Only to the Kern Delta, Cawelo, Rag Gulch, and Kern-Tulare Water Districts [35525. - 35539.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Water Distribution [35525. - 35531.]

35525.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only to the Kern Delta Water District, the Cawelo Water District, the Rag Gulch Water District, and the Kern-Tulare Water District as member units of the Kern County Water Agency or to an improvement district formed within the Kern Delta Water District, the Cawelo Water District, the Rag Gulch Water District, or the Kern-Tulare Water District pursuant to the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

35526.
